Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6159SV (1) 91 th/ns S.F. 2383 Section 1. Section 507B.4, subsection 3, paragraph j, Code 1 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (16) Failing to comply with section 3 507B.10. 4 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 507B.10 Settled motor vehicle 5 insurance claims involving aftermarket crash parts or original 6 equipment manufacturer parts. 7 1. When a first-party, partial-loss claim relating to a 8 motor vehicle is settled based on a written estimate prepared 9 by or for the insurer that includes payment for aftermarket 10 crash parts, the property insurer shall estimate the cost of 11 repairs and pay the claim based only on the cost of aftermarket 12 crash parts available from a distributor of each such part that 13 is located within one hundred miles of the repair facility 14 designated by the insured to make the repairs. The insurer 15 shall pay the cost of any modifications which may become 16 necessary when repairs are made using aftermarket crash parts 17 or parts salvaged from the crashed vehicle. 18 2. When a third-party, partial-loss claim relating to a 19 motor vehicle is settled based on a written estimate prepared 20 by or for the insurer, the liability insurer shall estimate 21 the cost of repairs and pay the claim based only on the cost 22 of new original equipment manufacturer parts unless all of the 23 following occur: 24 a. The insurer notifies the owner of the ownerâs right 25 to have the vehicle repaired based on the cost of using new 26 original equipment manufacturer parts. 27 b. The motor vehicle owner gives express consent in writing 28 that aftermarket crash parts or parts salvaged from the crashed 29 vehicle may be used. 30 c. The insurer expressly agrees to pay the cost of any 31 modifications which may become necessary when repairs are 32 made using aftermarket crash parts or parts salvaged from the 33 crashed vehicle and expressly agrees to defend and indemnify 34 the owner of the motor vehicle and the repair facility against 35 -1- LSB 6159SV (1) 91 th/ns 1/ 3 S.F. 2383 any claims related to repairs made using aftermarket crash 1 parts or parts salvaged from the crashed vehicle. 2 3. As used in this section: 3 a. âAftermarket crash partâ means as defined in section 4 537B.4. 5 b. âMotor vehicleâ means as defined in section 321.1. 6 c. âRepair facilityâ means as defined in section 537B.4. 7